Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Medical Assistance Program.

§§ 32.1-74 through 32.1-76.3.
Repealed by Acts 1984, c. 781, effective March 1, 1985.

Cross references.

As to the Department of Medical Assistance Services, see now §

32.1-323

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Former § 32.1-76.1 was previously repealed by Acts 1984, c. 629.